Hawaii statutes.
§329-20 Schedule IV. (a) The
controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule IV.

(b) Depressants. Any material, compound,
mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following
substances, including its salts, isomers, esters, ethers, and salts of isomers,
whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible
within the specific chemical designation, that has a degree of danger or
probable danger associated with a depressant effect on the central nervous
system:

(1) Alprazolam;

(2) Barbital;

(3) Bromazepam;

(4) Butorphanol;

(5) Camazepam;

(6) Carisoprodol;

(7) Chloral betaine;

(8) Chloral hydrate;

(9) Chlordiazepoxide;

(10) Clobazam;

(11) Clonazepam;

(12) Clorazepate;

(13) Clotiazepam;

(14) Cloxazolam;

(15) Delorazepam;

(16) Dichloralphenazone (Midrin);

(17) Diazepam;

(18) Estazolam;

(19) Ethchlorvynol;

(20) Ethinamate;

(21) Ethyl loflazepate;

(22) Fludiazepam;

(23) Flunitrazepam;

(24) Flurazepam;

(25) Fospropofol (Lusedra);

(26) Halazepam;

(27) Haloxazolam;

(28) Ketazolam;

(29) Loprazolam;

(30) Lorazepam;

(31) Lormetazepam;

(32) Mebutamate;

(33) Medazepam;

(34) Meprobamate;

(35) Methohexital;

(36) Methylphenobarbital (mephorbarbital);

(37) Midazolam;

(38) Nimetazepam;

(39) Nitrazepam;

(40) Nordiazepam;

(41) Oxazepam;

(42) Oxazolam;

(43) Paraldehyde;

(44) Petrichloral;

(45) Phenobarbital;

(46) Pinazepam;

(47) Prazepam;

(48) Quazepam;

(49) Suvorexant;

(50) Temazepam;

(51) Tetrazepam;

(52) Triazolam;

(53) Zaleplon;

(54) Zolpidem; and

(55) Zopiclone (Lunesta).

(c) Fenfluramine. Any material, compound,
mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following
substances, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the
existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible:
Fenfluramine.

(d) Stimulants. Unless listed in another
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any
quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central
nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of such isomers
whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible
within the specific chemical designation:

(1) Cathine ((+)-norpseudoephedrine);

(2) Diethylpropion;

(3) Fencamfamin;

(4) Fenproporex;

(5) Mazindol;

(6) Mefenorex;

(7) Modafinil;

(8) Phentermine;

(9) Pemoline (including organometallic complexes and
chelates thereof);

(10) Pipradrol;

(11) Sibutramine;

(12) SPA (1-dimethylamino-1,2-diphenylethane,
lefetamine); and

(13) Lorcaserin.

(e) Other substances. Unless specifically
excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture,
or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances,
including its optical isomers and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers:

(1) Pentazocine; and

(2) Eluxadoline
(5-[[[(2S)-2-amino-3-[4-aminocarbonyl)-2,6-dimethylphenyl]-1-oxopropyl][(1S)-1-(4-phenyl-1H-imidazol-2-yl)ethyl]amino]methyl]-2-methoxybenzoic
acid.

(f) The department of public safety may except
by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any depressant
substance listed in subsection (b) or any stimulant listed in subsection (d)
from the application of all or any part of this chapter if the compound,
mixture, or preparation contains one or more active medicinal ingredients not
having a depressant or stimulant effect on the central nervous system, and if
the admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or
concentration that vitiate the degree of danger or probable danger of the
substances which have a depressant or stimulant effect on the central nervous
system.

(g) Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically
excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture,
or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts
calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set
forth below:

(1) Not more than one milligram of difenoxin and not
less than twenty-five micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;

(2) Dextropropoxyphene (alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino-1,
2-diphenyl-3-methyl-2-propionoxybutane); and

(3) 2-[(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol,
its salts, optical and geometric isomers and salts of these isomers (including
tramadol). [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1; am L 1973, c 184, §1; am L 1974, c 217, §4;
am L 1977, c 116, §3; am L 1978, c 68, §5; am L 1979, c 194, §3; am L 1980, c
140, §2; am L 1985, c 150, §3; am L 1987, c 203, §2; am L 1990, c 281, §10; am
L 1993, c 9, §1; am L 1995, c 122, §4; am L 2000, c 98, §5; am L 2001, c 203,
§5; am L 2002, c 165, §2; am L 2003, c 151, §5; am L 2006, c 171, §1; am L
2008, c 119, §5; am L 2010, c 123, §3; am L 2014, c 54, §3; am L 2015, c 195,
§3; am L 2016, c 218, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next